Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.211

Discipline policies, procedures, and rules—Dissemination of information—Use of disaggregated data—Review.

(1) School districts shall annually disseminate discipline policies and procedures to students, families, and the community.

(2) School districts shall use disaggregated data collected pursuant to RCW 28A.300.042 to monitor the impact of the school district's discipline policies and procedures.

(3) School districts, in consultation with school district staff, students, families, and the community, shall periodically review and update their discipline rules, policies, and procedures.

[ 2016 c 72 s 102.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2016 c 72: See note following RCW 28A.600.015.